test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-4lex_kapuluh_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kápuluh: # ok
    kápuluh+N+Sg+Nom: [kápulâh, kápuluh, kápuloh]
    kápuluh+N+Sg+Gen: kápuluv
    kápuluh+N+Sg+Acc: kápuluv
    kápuluh+N+Sg+Ill: kápulâhân
    kápuluh+N+Sg+Loc: [kápuluvâst, kápuluvvâst]
    kápuluh+N+Sg+Com: [kápuluváin, kápuluvváin]
    kápuluh+N+Sg+Abe: kápuluvttáá
    kápuluh+N+Ess: [kápulâhhân, kápuluhhân, kápulohhân]
    kápuluh+N+Par: [kápulâhhâd, kápuluhhâd, kápulohhâd]
    kápuluh+N+Pl+Nom: kápuluvah
    kápuluh+N+Pl+Gen: kápuluvâi
    kápuluh+N+Pl+Acc: kápuluvâid
    kápuluh+N+Pl+Ill: kápuluvváid
    kápuluh+N+Pl+Loc: kápuluvâin
    kápuluh+N+Pl+Com: [kápuluvâiguin, kápuluvâigijn]
    kápuluh+N+Pl+Abe: kápuluvâittáá
